Wisconsin, session 2025, SB967.
do enact as follows:SB967,11Section 1. 82.03 (5) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:SB967,2,6282.03 (5) (ag) Notwithstanding s. 31.02 (2), the town board may prescribe the 3maximum water elevation for an artificial water body created by a dam that 4includes the use of a diversion pump and that is located in the town if the town 5board has determined that a certain water elevation of that water body causes the 6road bed of a highway in the town to be saturated.SB967,27Section 2. 82.03 (5) (c) of the statutes is renumbered 82.03 (5) (b) 3.SB967,38Section 3. 88.90 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB967,2,15988.90 (1) Whenever any natural watercourse becomes obstructed so that the 10natural flow of water along the same is retarded by the negligent action of the 11owner, occupant, or person in charge of the land on which the obstruction is located, 12the owner or occupant of any lands damaged due to ground or surface water 13flooding caused by such obstruction may request the removal thereof by giving 14notice in writing to such owner, occupant, or person in charge of the land on which 15the obstruction is located.SB967,2,1616